Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 59. Commission on Employee Retirement Security and Pension Reform.

§§ 30-371 through 30-375.
[Expired.]

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 683 enacted Chapter 58 (§ 30-362 et seq.), which was subsequently renumberd as Chapter 59 (§ 30-371 through 30-375) at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, and expired by its own terms, effective
July 1, 2021.